Utah statutes.
53A-13-107.   Adoption information.

(1)  For a school year beginning with or after the 2012-13 school year, a local school board shall ensure that an annual presentation on adoption is given to its secondary school students in grades 7-12, so that each student receives the presentation at least once during grades 7-9 and at least once during grades 10-12.

(2)  The presentation shall be made by a licensed teacher as part of the health education core.



Amended by Chapter 305, 2010 General Session

